Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 3. JUVENILE JUSTICE CODE

CHAPTER 58. RECORDS; JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. CREATION AND CONFIDENTIALITY OF JUVENILE RECORDS

Sec. 58.001. LAW ENFORCEMENT COLLECTION AND TRANSMITTAL OF RECORDS OF CHILDREN. (a) Law enforcement officers and other juvenile justice personnel shall collect information described by Section 58.104 as a part of the juvenile justice information system created under Subchapter B.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) A law enforcement agency shall forward information, including fingerprints, relating to a child who has been taken into custody under Section 52.01 by the agency to the Department of Public Safety for inclusion in the juvenile justice information system created under Subchapter B, but only if the child is referred to juvenile court on or before the 10th day after the date the child is taken into custody under Section 52.01. If the child is not referred to juvenile court within that time, the law enforcement agency shall destroy all information, including photographs and fingerprints, relating to the child unless the child is placed in a first offender program under Section 52.031 or on informal disposition under Section 52.03. The law enforcement agency may not forward any information to the Department of Public Safety relating to the child while the child is in a first offender program under Section 52.031, or during the 90 days following successful completion of the program or while the child is on informal disposition under Section 52.03. Except as provided by Subsection (f), after the date the child completes an informal disposition under Section 52.03 or after the 90th day after the date the child successfully completes a first offender program under Section 52.031, the law enforcement agency shall destroy all information, including photographs and fingerprints, relating to the child.

(d) If information relating to a child is contained in a document that also contains information relating to an adult and a law enforcement agency is required to destroy all information relating to the child under this section, the agency shall alter the document so that the information relating to the child is destroyed and the information relating to the adult is preserved.

(e) The deletion of a computer entry constitutes destruction of the information contained in the entry.

(f) A law enforcement agency may maintain information relating to a child after the 90th day after the date the child successfully completes a first offender program under Section 52.031 only to determine the child's eligibility to participate in a first offender program.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.002. PHOTOGRAPHS AND FINGERPRINTS OF CHILDREN. (a) Except as provided by Chapter 63, Code of Criminal Procedure, a child may not be photographed or fingerprinted without the consent of the juvenile court unless the child is:

(1) taken into custody; or

(2) referred to the juvenile court for conduct that constitutes a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail, regardless of whether the child has been taken into custody.

(b) On or before December 31 of each year, the head of each municipal or county law enforcement agency located in a county shall certify to the juvenile board for that county that the photographs and fingerprints required to be destroyed under Section 58.001 have been destroyed. The juvenile board may conduct or cause to be conducted an audit of the records of the law enforcement agency to verify the destruction of the photographs and fingerprints and the law enforcement agency shall make its records available for this purpose. If the audit shows that the certification provided by the head of the law enforcement agency is false, that person is subject to prosecution for perjury under Chapter 37, Penal Code.

(c) This section does not prohibit a law enforcement officer from photographing or fingerprinting a child who is not in custody or who has not been referred to the juvenile court for conduct that constitutes a felony or misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail if the child's parent or guardian voluntarily consents in writing to the photographing or fingerprinting of the child. Consent of the child's parent or guardian is not required to photograph or fingerprint a child described by Subsection (a)(1) or (2).

(d) This section does not apply to fingerprints that are required or authorized to be submitted or obtained for an application for a driver's license or personal identification card.

(e) This section does not prohibit a law enforcement officer from fingerprinting or photographing a child as provided by Section 58.0021.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.0021. FINGERPRINTS OR PHOTOGRAPHS FOR COMPARISON IN INVESTIGATION. (a) A law enforcement officer may take temporary custody of a child to take the child's fingerprints if:

(1) the officer has probable cause to believe that the child has engaged in delinquent conduct;

(2) the officer has investigated that conduct and has found other fingerprints during the investigation; and

(3) the officer has probable cause to believe that the child's fingerprints will match the other fingerprints.

(b) A law enforcement officer may take temporary custody of a child to take the child's photograph, or may obtain a photograph of a child from a juvenile probation department in possession of a photograph of the child, if:

(1) the officer has probable cause to believe that the child has engaged in delinquent conduct; and

(2) the officer has probable cause to believe that the child's photograph will be of material assistance in the investigation of that conduct.

(c) Temporary custody for the purpose described by Subsection (a) or (b):

(1) is not a taking into custody under Section 52.01; and

(2) may not be reported to the juvenile justice information system under Subchapter B.

(d) If a law enforcement officer does not take the child into custody under Section 52.01, the child shall be released from temporary custody authorized under this section as soon as the fingerprints or photographs are obtained.

(e) A law enforcement officer who under this section obtains fingerprints or photographs from a child shall:

(1) immediately destroy them if they do not lead to a positive comparison or identification; and

(2) make a reasonable effort to notify the child's parent, guardian, or custodian of the action taken.

(f) A law enforcement officer may under this section obtain fingerprints or photographs from a child at:

(1) a juvenile processing office; or

(2) a location that affords reasonable privacy to the child.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.0022. FINGERPRINTS OR PHOTOGRAPHS TO IDENTIFY RUNAWAYS. A law enforcement officer who takes a child into custody with probable cause to believe that the child has engaged in conduct indicating a need for supervision as described by Section 51.03(b)(2) and who after reasonable effort is unable to determine the identity of the child, may fingerprint or photograph the child to establish the child's identity. On determination of the child's identity or that the child cannot be identified by the fingerprints or photographs, the law enforcement officer shall immediately destroy all copies of the fingerprint records or photographs of the child.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 58.004. REDACTION OF VICTIM'S PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, before disclosing any juvenile court record of a child as authorized by this chapter or other law, the custodian of the record must redact any personally identifiable information about a victim of the child's delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision who was under 18 years of age on the date the conduct occurred.

(b) This section does not apply to information that is:

(1) necessary for an agency to provide services to the victim;

(2) necessary for law enforcement purposes;

(3) shared within the statewide juvenile information and case management system established under Subchapter E;

(4) shared with an attorney representing the child in a proceeding under this title; or

(5) shared with an attorney representing any other person in a juvenile or criminal court proceeding arising from the same act or conduct for which the child was referred to juvenile court.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 588 (H.B. 4003), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.005. CONFIDENTIALITY OF FACILITY RECORDS. (a) This section applies only to the inspection, copying, and maintenance of a record concerning a child and to the storage of information from which a record could be generated, including personally identifiable information, information obtained for the purpose of diagnosis, examination, evaluation, or treatment of the child or for making a referral for treatment of the child, and other records or information, created by or in the possession of:

(1) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(2) an entity having custody of the child under a contract with the Texas Juvenile Justice Department; or

(3) another public or private agency or institution having custody of the child under order of the juvenile court, including a facility operated by or under contract with a juvenile board or juvenile probation department.

(a-1) Except as provided by Article 15.27, Code of Criminal Procedure, the records and information to which this section applies may be disclosed only to:

(1) the professional staff or consultants of the agency or institution;

(2) the judge, probation officers, and professional staff or consultants of the juvenile court;

(3) an attorney for the child;

(4) a governmental agency if the disclosure is required or authorized by law;

(5) an individual or entity to whom the child is referred for treatment or services, including assistance in transitioning the child to the community after the child's release or discharge from a juvenile facility;

(6) the Texas Department of Criminal Justice and the Texas Juvenile Justice Department for the purpose of maintaining statistical records of recidivism and for diagnosis and classification;

(7) a prosecuting attorney;

(8) a parent, guardian, or custodian with whom a child will reside after the child's release or discharge from a juvenile facility;

(9) a governmental agency or court if the record is necessary for an administrative or legal proceeding and the personally identifiable information about the child is redacted before the record is disclosed; or

(10) with permission from the juvenile court, any other individual, agency, or institution having a legitimate interest in the proceeding or in the work of the court.

(b) This section does not affect the collection, dissemination, or maintenance of information as provided by Subchapter B or D-1.

(c) An individual or entity that receives confidential information under this section may not disclose the information unless otherwise authorized by law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 283, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 26(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 60, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.0051. INTERAGENCY SHARING OF EDUCATIONAL RECORDS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Educational records" means records in the possession of a primary or secondary educational institution that contain information relating to a student, including information relating to the student's:

(A) identity;

(B) special needs;

(C) educational accommodations;

(D) assessment or diagnostic test results;

(E) attendance records;

(F) disciplinary records;

(G) medical records; and

(H) psychological diagnoses.

Text of subdivision effective until April 01, 2025

(2) "Juvenile service provider" means a governmental entity that provides juvenile justice or prevention, medical, educational, or other support services to a juvenile. The term includes:

(A) a state or local juvenile justice agency as defined by Section 58.101;

(B) health and human services agencies, as defined by Section 531.001, Government Code, and the Health and Human Services Commission;

(C) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(D) the Department of Public Safety;

(E) the Texas Education Agency;

(F) an independent school district;

(G) a juvenile justice alternative education program;

(H) a charter school;

(I) a local mental health authority or local intellectual and developmental disability authority;

(J) a court with jurisdiction over juveniles;

(K) a district attorney's office;

(L) a county attorney's office; and

(M) a children's advocacy center established under Section 264.402.

Text of subdivision effective on April 01, 2025

(2) "Juvenile service provider" means a governmental entity that provides juvenile justice or prevention, medical, educational, or other support services to a juvenile. The term includes:

(A) a state or local juvenile justice agency as defined by Section 58.101;

(B) health and human services agencies, as defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code, and the Health and Human Services Commission;

(C) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(D) the Department of Public Safety;

(E) the Texas Education Agency;

(F) an independent school district;

(G) a juvenile justice alternative education program;

(H) a charter school;

(I) a local mental health authority or local intellectual and developmental disability authority;

(J) a court with jurisdiction over juveniles;

(K) a district attorney's office;

(L) a county attorney's office; and

(M) a children's advocacy center established under Section 264.402.

(3) "Student" means a person who:

(A) is registered or in attendance at a primary or secondary educational institution; and

(B) is younger than 18 years of age.

(b) At the request of a juvenile service provider, an independent school district or a charter school shall disclose to the juvenile service provider confidential information contained in the student's educational records if the student has been:

(1) taken into custody under Section 52.01; or

(2) referred to a juvenile court for allegedly engaging in delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision.

(c) An independent school district or charter school that discloses confidential information to a juvenile service provider under Subsection (b) may not destroy a record of the disclosed information before the seventh anniversary of the date the information is disclosed.

(d) An independent school district or charter school shall comply with a request under Subsection (b) regardless of whether other state law makes that information confidential.

(e) A juvenile service provider that receives confidential information under this section shall:

(1) certify in writing that the juvenile service provider receiving the confidential information has agreed not to disclose it to a third party, other than another juvenile service provider; and

(2) use the confidential information only to:

(A) verify the identity of a student involved in the juvenile justice system; and

(B) provide delinquency prevention or treatment services to the student.

(f) A juvenile service provider may establish an internal protocol for sharing information with other juvenile service providers as necessary to efficiently and promptly disclose and accept the information. The protocol may specify the types of information that may be shared under this section without violating federal law, including any federal funding requirements. A juvenile service provider may enter into a memorandum of understanding with another juvenile service provider to share information according to the juvenile service provider's protocols. A juvenile service provider shall comply with this section regardless of whether the juvenile service provider establishes an internal protocol or enters into a memorandum of understanding under this subsection unless compliance with this section violates federal law.

(g) This section does not affect the confidential status of the information being shared. The information may be released to a third party only as directed by a court order or as otherwise authorized by law. Personally identifiable information disclosed to a juvenile service provider under this section is not subject to disclosure to a third party under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(h) A juvenile service provider that requests information under this section shall pay a fee to the disclosing juvenile service provider in the same amounts charged for the provision of public information under Subchapter F, Chapter 552, Government Code, unless:

(1) a memorandum of understanding between the requesting provider and the disclosing provider:

(A) prohibits the payment of a fee;

(B) provides for the waiver of a fee; or

(C) provides an alternate method of assessing a fee;

(2) the disclosing provider waives the payment of the fee; or

(3) disclosure of the information is required by law other than this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 653 (S.B. 1106), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 316 (H.B. 5), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.06, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 58.0052. INTERAGENCY SHARING OF CERTAIN NONEDUCATIONAL RECORDS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Juvenile justice agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 58.101.

(2) "Juvenile service provider" has the meaning assigned by Section 58.0051.

(3) "Multi-system youth" means a person who:

(A) is younger than 19 years of age; and

(B) has received services from two or more juvenile service providers.

(4) "Personal health information" means personally identifiable information regarding a multi-system youth's physical or mental health or the provision of or payment for health care services, including case management services, to a multi-system youth. The term does not include clinical psychological notes or substance abuse treatment information.

(b) Subject to Subsection (c), at the request of a juvenile service provider, another juvenile service provider shall disclose to that provider a multi-system youth's personal health information or a history of governmental services provided to the multi-system youth, including:

(1) identity records;

(2) medical and dental records;

(3) assessment or diagnostic test results;

(4) special needs;

(5) program placements;

(6) psychological diagnoses; and

(7) other related records or information.

(b-1) In addition to the information provided under Subsection (b), the Department of Family and Protective Services and the Texas Juvenile Justice Department shall coordinate and develop protocols for sharing with each other, on request, any other information relating to a multi-system youth necessary to:

(1) identify and coordinate the provision of services to the youth and prevent duplication of services;

(2) enhance rehabilitation of the youth; and

(3) improve and maintain community safety.

(b-2) At the request of the Department of Family and Protective Services or a single source continuum contractor who contracts with the department to provide foster care services, a state or local juvenile justice agency shall share with the department or contractor information in the possession of the juvenile justice agency that is necessary to improve and maintain community safety or that assists the department or contractor in the continuation of services for or providing services to a multi-system youth who is or has been in the custody or control of the juvenile justice agency.

(b-3) At the request of a state or local juvenile justice agency, the Department of Family and Protective Services or a single source continuum contractor who contracts with the department to provide foster care services shall, not later than the 14th business day after the date of the request, share with the juvenile justice agency information in the possession of the department or contractor that is necessary to improve and maintain community safety or that assists the agency in the continuation of services for or providing services to a multi-system youth who:

(1) is or has been in the temporary or permanent managing conservatorship of the department;

(2) is or was the subject of a family-based safety services case with the department;

(3) has been reported as an alleged victim of abuse or neglect to the department;

(4) is the perpetrator in a case in which the department investigation concluded that there was a reason to believe that abuse or neglect occurred; or

(5) is a victim in a case in which the department investigation concluded that there was a reason to believe that abuse or neglect occurred.

(c) A juvenile service provider may disclose personally identifiable information under this section only for the purposes of:

(1) identifying a multi-system youth;

(2) coordinating and monitoring care for a multi-system youth; and

(3) improving the quality of juvenile services provided to a multi-system youth.

(d) To the extent that this section conflicts with another law of this state with respect to confidential information held by a governmental agency, this section controls.

(e) A juvenile service provider may establish an internal protocol for sharing information with other juvenile service providers as necessary to efficiently and promptly disclose and accept the information. The protocol may specify the types of information that may be shared under this section without violating federal law, including any federal funding requirements. A juvenile service provider may enter into a memorandum of understanding with another juvenile service provider to share information according to the juvenile service provider's protocols. A juvenile service provider shall comply with this section regardless of whether the juvenile service provider establishes an internal protocol or enters into a memorandum of understanding under this subsection unless compliance with this section violates federal law.

(f) This section does not affect the confidential status of the information being shared. The information may be released to a third party only as directed by a court order or as otherwise authorized by law. Personally identifiable information disclosed to a juvenile service provider under this section is not subject to disclosure to a third party under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(g) This section does not affect the authority of a governmental agency to disclose to a third party for research purposes information that is not personally identifiable as provided by the governmental agency's protocol.

(h) A juvenile service provider that requests information under this section shall pay a fee to the disclosing juvenile service provider in the same amounts charged for the provision of public information under Subchapter F, Chapter 552, Government Code, unless:

(1) a memorandum of understanding between the requesting provider and the disclosing provider:

(A) prohibits the payment of a fee;

(B) provides for the waiver of a fee; or

(C) provides an alternate method of assessing a fee;

(2) the disclosing provider waives the payment of the fee; or

(3) disclosure of the information is required by law other than this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 653 (S.B. 1106), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 944 (S.B. 206), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 317 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 1521), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.007. CONFIDENTIALITY OF PROBATION DEPARTMENT, PROSECUTOR, AND COURT RECORDS. (a) This section applies only to the inspection, copying, and maintenance of a record concerning a child and the storage of information, by electronic means or otherwise, concerning the child from which a record could be generated and does not affect the collection, dissemination, or maintenance of information as provided by Subchapter B or D-1. This section does not apply to a record relating to a child that is:

(1) required or authorized to be maintained under the laws regulating the operation of motor vehicles in this state;

(2) maintained by a municipal or justice court;

(3) subject to disclosure under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(4) required to be provided to the Federal Bureau of Investigation under Section 411.052, Government Code, for use with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System; or

(5) required to be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety under Section 411.0521, Government Code.

(b) Except as provided by Section 54.051(d-1) and by Article 15.27, Code of Criminal Procedure, the records, whether physical or electronic, of a juvenile court, a clerk of court, a juvenile probation department, or a prosecuting attorney relating to a child who is a party to a proceeding under this title may be inspected or copied only by:

(1) the judge, probation officers, and professional staff or consultants of the juvenile court;

(2) a juvenile justice agency as that term is defined by Section 58.101;

(3) an attorney representing the child's parent in a proceeding under this title;

(4) an attorney representing the child;

(5) a prosecuting attorney;

(6) an individual or entity to whom the child is referred for treatment or services, including assistance in transitioning the child to the community after the child's release or discharge from a juvenile facility;

(7) a public or private agency or institution providing supervision of the child by arrangement of the juvenile court, or having custody of the child under juvenile court order; or

(8) with permission from the juvenile court, any other individual, agency, or institution having a legitimate interest in the proceeding or in the work of the court.

(b-1) A person who is the subject of the records is entitled to access the records for the purpose of preparing and presenting a motion or application to seal the records.

(c) An individual or entity that receives confidential information under this section may not disclose the information unless otherwise authorized by law.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

(g) For the purpose of offering a record as evidence in the punishment phase of a criminal proceeding, a prosecuting attorney may obtain the record of a defendant's adjudication that is admissible under Section 3(a), Article 37.07, Code of Criminal Procedure, by submitting a request for the record to the juvenile court that made the adjudication. If a court receives a request from a prosecuting attorney under this subsection, the court shall, if the court possesses the requested record of adjudication, certify and provide the prosecuting attorney with a copy of the record. If a record has been sealed under this chapter, the juvenile court may not provide a copy of the record to a prosecuting attorney under this subsection.

(h) The juvenile court may disseminate to the public the following information relating to a child who is the subject of a directive to apprehend or a warrant of arrest and who cannot be located for the purpose of apprehension:

(1) the child's name, including other names by which the child is known;

(2) the child's physical description, including sex, weight, height, race, ethnicity, eye color, hair color, scars, marks, and tattoos;

(3) a photograph of the child; and

(4) a description of the conduct the child is alleged to have committed, including the level and degree of the alleged offense.

(i) In addition to the authority to release information under Subsection (b)(6), a juvenile probation department may release information contained in its records without leave of the juvenile court pursuant to guidelines adopted by the juvenile board.

(j) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 12(3), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 815, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1415, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 879 (H.B. 1960), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.061, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 124 (S.B. 670), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1299 (H.B. 2862), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 61, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 12(3), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 341 (S.B. 728), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 58.008. CONFIDENTIALITY OF LAW ENFORCEMENT RECORDS. (a) This section applies only to the inspection, copying, and maintenance of a record concerning a child and to the storage of information, by electronic means or otherwise, concerning the child from which a record could be generated and does not affect the collection, dissemination, or maintenance of information as provided by Subchapter B. This section does not apply to a record relating to a child that is:

(1) required or authorized to be maintained under the laws regulating the operation of motor vehicles in this state;

(2) maintained by a municipal or justice court; or

(3) subject to disclosure under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), law enforcement records concerning a child and information concerning a child that are stored by electronic means or otherwise and from which a record could be generated may not be disclosed to the public and shall be:

(1) if maintained on paper or microfilm, kept separate from adult records;

(2) if maintained electronically in the same computer system as adult records, accessible only under controls that are separate and distinct from the controls to access electronic data concerning adults; and

(3) maintained on a local basis only and not sent to a central state or federal depository, except as provided by Subsection (c) or Subchapter B, D, or E.

(c) The law enforcement records of a person with a determinate sentence who is transferred to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice may be transferred to a central state or federal depository for adult records after the date of transfer and may be shared in accordance with the laws governing the adult records in the depository.

(d) Law enforcement records concerning a child may be inspected or copied by:

(1) a juvenile justice agency, as defined by Section 58.101;

(2) a criminal justice agency, as defined by Section 411.082, Government Code;

(3) the child;

(4) the child's parent or guardian; or

(5) the chief executive officer or the officer's designee of a primary or secondary school where the child is enrolled only for the purpose of conducting a threat assessment or preparing a safety plan related to the child.

(d-1) For purposes of Subsection (d), "chief executive officer" includes:

(1) the superintendent of a public school;

(2) the director of an open-enrollment charter school; and

(3) the chief executive officer of a private school.

(e) Before a child or a child's parent or guardian may inspect or copy a record concerning the child under Subsection (d), the custodian of the record shall redact:

(1) any personally identifiable information about a juvenile suspect, offender, victim, or witness who is not the child; and

(2) any information that is excepted from required disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, or any other law.

(f) If a child has been reported missing by a parent, guardian, or conservator of that child, information about the child may be forwarded to and disseminated by the Texas Crime Information Center and the National Crime Information Center.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (S.B. 2135), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.009. DISSEMINATION OF JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION BY THE TEXAS JUVENILE JUSTICE DEPARTMENT. (a) Except as provided by this section, juvenile justice information collected and maintained by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department for statistical and research purposes is confidential information for the use of the department and may not be disseminated by the department.

(b) Juvenile justice information consists of information of the type described by Section 58.104, including statistical data in any form or medium collected, maintained, or submitted to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department under Section 221.007, Human Resources Code.

(c) The Texas Juvenile Justice Department may grant access to juvenile justice information:

(1) for research and statistical purposes or for any other purpose approved by the department to:

(A) criminal justice agencies as defined by Section 411.082, Government Code;

(B) the Texas Education Agency, as authorized under Section 37.084, Education Code;

(C) any agency under the authority of the Health and Human Services Commission; or

(D) the Department of Family and Protective Services; or

(2) for a purpose beneficial to and approved by the department to an individual or entity that:

(A) is working on a research or statistical project that meets the requirements of and is approved by the department; and

(B) has a specific agreement with the department that:

(i) specifically authorizes access to identifiable juvenile justice information;

(ii) limits the use of the information to the purposes for which the information is given;

(iii) ensures the security and confidentiality of the information; and

(iv) provides for sanctions if a requirement imposed under Subparagraph (i), (ii), or (iii) is violated.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 56(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

(e) The Texas Juvenile Justice Department shall grant access to juvenile justice information for legislative purposes under Section 552.008, Government Code.

(f) The Texas Juvenile Justice Department may not release juvenile justice information in identifiable form, except for information released under Subsection (c). For purposes of this subsection, identifiable information means information that contains a juvenile offender's name or other personal identifiers or that can, by virtue of sample size or other factors, be reasonably interpreted as referring to a particular juvenile offender.

(f-1) In accordance with Chapter 552, Government Code, the Texas Juvenile Justice Department may grant access to juvenile justice information that is not identifiable information for research or statistical purposes or for any other purpose approved by the department to:

(1) criminal justice agencies as defined by Section 411.082, Government Code;

(2) the Texas Education Agency, as authorized under Section 37.084, Education Code;

(3) any agency under the authority of the Health and Human Services Commission;

(4) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(5) a public or private university; or

(6) an individual or entity working on a research or statistical project.

(g) Except as provided by Subsection (e), the Texas Juvenile Justice Department is permitted but not required to release or disclose juvenile justice information to any person identified under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.009, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 62, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 316 (H.B. 5), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated and amended from Family Code, Section 58.0072 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1727), Sec. 56(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM

Sec. 58.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Criminal justice agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 411.082, Government Code.

(2) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas.

(3) "Disposition" means an action that results in the termination, transfer of jurisdiction, or indeterminate suspension of the prosecution of a juvenile offender.

(4) "Incident number" means a unique number assigned to a child during a specific custodial or detention period or for a specific referral to the office or official designated by the juvenile board, if the juvenile offender was not taken into custody before the referral.

(5) "Juvenile justice agency" means an agency that has custody or control over juvenile offenders.

(6) "Juvenile offender" means a child who has been assigned an incident number.

(7) "State identification number" means a unique number assigned by the department to a child in the juvenile justice information system.

(8) "Uniform incident fingerprint card" means a multiple-part form containing a unique incident number with space for information relating to the conduct for which a child has been taken into custody, detained, or referred, the child's fingerprints, and other relevant information.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 58.102. JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM. (a) The department is responsible for recording data and maintaining a database for a computerized juvenile justice information system that serves:

(1) as the record creation point for the juvenile justice information system maintained by the state; and

(2) as the control terminal for entry of records, in accordance with federal law, rule, and policy, into the federal records system maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) The department shall develop and maintain the system with the cooperation and advice of the:

(1) Texas Juvenile Justice Department; and

(2) juvenile courts and clerks of juvenile courts.

(c) The department may not collect, retain, or share information relating to a juvenile except as provided by this chapter.

(d) The database must contain the information required by this subchapter.

(e) The department shall designate the offense codes and has the sole responsibility for designating the state identification number for each juvenile whose name appears in the juvenile justice system.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 63, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.103. PURPOSE OF SYSTEM. The purpose of the juvenile justice information system is to:

(1) provide agencies and personnel within the juvenile justice system accurate information relating to children who come into contact with the juvenile justice system of this state;

(2) provide, where allowed by law, adult criminal justice agencies accurate and easily accessible information relating to children who come into contact with the juvenile justice system;

(3) provide an efficient conversion, where appropriate, of juvenile records to adult criminal records;

(4) improve the quality of data used to conduct impact analyses of proposed legislative changes in the juvenile justice system; and

(5) improve the ability of interested parties to analyze the functioning of the juvenile justice system.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 58.104. TYPES OF INFORMATION COLLECTED. (a) Subject to Subsection (f), the juvenile justice information system shall consist of information relating to delinquent conduct committed or alleged to have been committed by a juvenile offender that, if the conduct had been committed by an adult, would constitute a criminal offense other than an offense punishable by a fine only, including information relating to:

(1) the juvenile offender;

(2) the intake or referral of the juvenile offender into the juvenile justice system;

(3) the detention of the juvenile offender;

(4) the prosecution of the juvenile offender;

(5) the disposition of the juvenile offender's case, including the name and description of any program to which the juvenile offender is referred;

(6) the probation or commitment of the juvenile offender; and

(7) the termination of probation supervision or discharge from commitment of the juvenile offender.

(b) To the extent possible and subject to Subsection (a), the department shall include in the juvenile justice information system the following information for each juvenile offender taken into custody, detained, or referred under this title for delinquent conduct:

(1) the juvenile offender's name, including other names by which the juvenile offender is known;

(2) the juvenile offender's date and place of birth;

(3) the juvenile offender's physical description, including sex, weight, height, race, ethnicity, eye color, hair color, scars, marks, and tattoos;

(4) the juvenile offender's state identification number, and other identifying information, as determined by the department;

(5) the juvenile offender's fingerprints;

(6) the juvenile offender's last known residential address, including the census tract number designation for the address;

(7) the name and identifying number of the agency that took into custody or detained the juvenile offender;

(8) the date of detention or custody;

(9) the conduct for which the juvenile offender was taken into custody, detained, or referred, including level and degree of the alleged offense;

(10) the name and identifying number of the juvenile intake agency or juvenile probation office;

(11) each disposition by the juvenile intake agency or juvenile probation office;

(12) the date of disposition by the juvenile intake agency or juvenile probation office;

(13) the name and identifying number of the prosecutor's office;

(14) each disposition by the prosecutor;

(15) the date of disposition by the prosecutor;

(16) the name and identifying number of the court;

(17) each disposition by the court, including information concerning probation or custody of a juvenile offender by a juvenile justice agency;

(18) the date of disposition by the court;

(19) the date any probation supervision, including deferred prosecution supervision, was terminated;

(20) any commitment or release under supervision by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(21) the date of any commitment or release under supervision by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department; and

(22) a description of each appellate proceeding.

(c) The department may designate codes relating to the information described by Subsection (b).

(d) The department shall designate a state identification number for each juvenile offender.

(e) This subchapter does not apply to a disposition that represents an administrative status notice of an agency described by Section 58.102(b).

(f) Records maintained by the department in the depository are subject to being sealed under Subchapter C-1.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 64, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.105. DUTIES OF JUVENILE BOARD. Each juvenile board shall provide for:

(1) the compilation and maintenance of records and information needed for reporting information to the department under this subchapter;

(2) the transmittal to the department, in the manner provided by the department, of all records and information required by the department under this subchapter; and

(3) access by the department to inspect records and information to determine the completeness and accuracy of information reported.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 58.106. DISSEMINATION OF CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION IN JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, information contained in the juvenile justice information system is confidential information for the use of the department and may not be disseminated by the department except:

(1) with the permission of the juvenile offender, to military personnel of this state or the United States;

(2) to a criminal justice agency as defined by Section 411.082, Government Code;

(3) to a noncriminal justice agency authorized by federal statute or federal executive order to receive juvenile justice record information;

(4) to a juvenile justice agency;

(5) to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(6) to the office of independent ombudsman of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(7) to a district, county, justice, or municipal court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile; and

(8) to the Department of Family and Protective Services or the Health and Human Services Commission as provided by Section 411.114, Government Code.

(a-1) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(7), eff. September 1, 2017.

(a-2) Information disseminated under Subsection (a) remains confidential after dissemination and may be disclosed by the recipient only as provided by this title.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a document maintained by a juvenile justice or law enforcement agency that is the source of information collected by the department.

(c) The department may, if necessary to protect the welfare of the community, disseminate to the public the following information relating to a juvenile who has escaped from the custody of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or from another secure detention or correctional facility:

(1) the juvenile's name, including other names by which the juvenile is known;

(2) the juvenile's physical description, including sex, weight, height, race, ethnicity, eye color, hair color, scars, marks, and tattoos;

(3) a photograph of the juvenile; and

(4) a description of the conduct for which the juvenile was committed to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or detained in the secure detention or correctional facility, including the level and degree of the alleged offense.

(d) The department may, if necessary to protect the welfare of the community, disseminate to the public the information listed under Subsection (c) relating to a juvenile offender when notified by a law enforcement agency of this state that the law enforcement agency has been issued a directive to apprehend the offender or an arrest warrant for the offender or that the law enforcement agency is otherwise authorized to arrest the offender and that the offender is suspected of having:

(1) committed a felony offense under the following provisions of the Penal Code:

(A) Title 5;

(B) Section 29.02; or

(C) Section 29.03; and

(2) fled from arrest or apprehension for commission of the offense.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 380, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 407, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 186 (S.B. 1241), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1098 (S.B. 1489), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 7.004, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 598 (S.B. 409), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 598 (S.B. 409), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 65, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 21(7), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 423 (H.B. 4158), Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 2021.

Sec. 58.107. COMPATIBILITY OF DATA. Data supplied to the juvenile justice information system must be compatible with the system and must contain both incident numbers and state identification numbers.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 58.108. DUTIES OF AGENCIES AND COURTS. (a) A juvenile justice agency and a clerk of a juvenile court shall:

(1) compile and maintain records needed for reporting data required by the department;

(2) transmit to the department in the manner provided by the department data required by the department;

(3) give the department or its accredited agents access to the agency or court for the purpose of inspection to determine the completeness and accuracy of data reported; and

(4) cooperate with the department to enable the department to perform its duties under this chapter.

(b) A juvenile justice agency and clerk of a court shall retain documents described by this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 58.109. UNIFORM INCIDENT FINGERPRINT CARD. (a) The department may provide for the use of a uniform incident fingerprint card in the maintenance of the juvenile justice information system.

(b) The department shall design, print, and distribute to each law enforcement agency and juvenile intake agency uniform incident fingerprint cards.

(c) The incident cards must:

(1) be serially numbered with an incident number in a manner that allows each incident of referral of a juvenile offender who is the subject of the incident fingerprint card to be readily ascertained; and

(2) be multiple-part forms that can be transmitted with the juvenile offender through the juvenile justice process and that allow each agency to report required data to the department.

(d) Subject to available telecommunications capacity, the department shall develop the capability to receive by electronic means from a law enforcement agency the information on the uniform incident fingerprint card. The information must be in a form that is compatible to the form required of data supplied to the juvenile justice information system.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 58.110. REPORTING. (a) The department by rule shall develop reporting procedures that ensure that the juvenile offender processing data is reported from the time a juvenile offender is initially taken into custody, detained, or referred until the time a juvenile offender is released from the jurisdiction of the juvenile justice system.

(b) The law enforcement agency or the juvenile intake agency that initiates the entry of the juvenile offender into the juvenile justice information system for a specific incident shall prepare a uniform incident fingerprint card and initiate the reporting process for each incident reportable under this subchapter.

(c) The clerk of the court exercising jurisdiction over a juvenile offender's case shall report the disposition of the case to the department.

(d) In each county, the reporting agencies may make alternative arrangements for reporting the required information, including combined reporting or electronic reporting, if the alternative reporting is approved by the juvenile board and the department.

(e) Except as otherwise required by applicable state laws or regulations, information required by this chapter to be reported to the department shall be reported promptly. The information shall be reported not later than the 30th day after the date the information is received by the agency responsible for reporting the information, except that a juvenile offender's custody or detention without previous custody shall be reported to the department not later than the seventh day after the date of the custody or detention.

(f) Subject to available telecommunications capacity, the department shall develop the capability to receive by electronic means the information required under this section to be reported to the department. The information must be in a form that is compatible to the form required of data to be reported under this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1276 (H.B. 1435), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 58.111. LOCAL DATA ADVISORY BOARDS. The commissioners court of each county may create a local data advisory board to perform the same duties relating to the juvenile justice information system as the duties performed by a local data advisory board in relation to the criminal history record system under Article 66.354, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2931), Sec. 4.05, eff. January 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.113. WARRANTS. The department shall maintain in a computerized database that is accessible by the same entities that may access the juvenile justice information system information relating to a warrant of arrest, as that term is defined by Article 15.01, Code of Criminal Procedure, or a directive to apprehend under Section 52.015 for any child, without regard to whether the child has been taken into custody.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 53, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

SUBCHAPTER C-1. SEALING AND DESTRUCTION OF JUVENILE RECORDS

Sec. 58.251. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Electronic record" means an entry in a computer file or information on microfilm, microfiche, or any other electronic storage media.

(2) "Juvenile matter" means a referral to a juvenile court or juvenile probation department and all related court proceedings and outcomes, if any.

(3) "Physical record" means a paper copy of a record.

(4) "Record" means any documentation related to a juvenile matter, including information contained in that documentation.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.252. EXEMPTED RECORDS. The following records are exempt from this subchapter:

(1) records relating to a criminal combination or criminal street gang maintained by the Department of Public Safety or a local law enforcement agency under Chapter 67, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) sex offender registration records maintained by the Department of Public Safety or a local law enforcement agency under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(3) records collected or maintained by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department for statistical and research purposes, including data submitted under Section 221.007, Human Resources Code, and personally identifiable information.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 7.002, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.253. SEALING RECORDS WITHOUT APPLICATION: DELINQUENT CONDUCT. (a) This section does not apply to the records of a child referred to a juvenile court or juvenile probation department solely for conduct indicating a need for supervision.

(b) A person who was referred to a juvenile probation department for delinquent conduct is entitled to have all records related to the person's juvenile matters, including records relating to any matters involving conduct indicating a need for supervision, sealed without applying to the juvenile court if the person:

(1) is at least 19 years of age;

(2) has not been adjudicated as having engaged in delinquent conduct or, if adjudicated for delinquent conduct, was not adjudicated for delinquent conduct violating a penal law of the grade of felony;

(3) does not have any pending delinquent conduct matters;

(4) has not been transferred by a juvenile court to a criminal court for prosecution under Section 54.02;

(5) has not as an adult been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail; and

(6) does not have any pending charges as an adult for a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.254. CERTIFICATION OF ELIGIBILITY FOR SEALING RECORDS WITHOUT APPLICATION FOR DELINQUENT CONDUCT. (a) The Department of Public Safety shall certify to a juvenile probation department that has submitted records to the juvenile justice information system that the records relating to a person referred to the juvenile probation department appear to be eligible for sealing under Section 58.253.

(b) The Department of Public Safety may issue the certification described by Subsection (a) by electronic means, including by electronic mail.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), not later than the 60th day after the date the juvenile probation department receives a certification under Subsection (a), the juvenile probation department shall:

(1) give notice of the receipt of the certification to the juvenile court; and

(2) provide the court with a list of all referrals received by the department relating to that person and the outcome of each referral.

(d) If a juvenile probation department has reason to believe the records of the person for whom the department received a certification under Subsection (a) are not eligible to be sealed, the juvenile probation department shall notify the Department of Public Safety not later than the 15th day after the date the juvenile probation department received the certification. If the juvenile probation department later determines that the person's records are eligible to be sealed, the juvenile probation department shall notify the juvenile court and provide the court the information described by Subsection (c) not later than the 30th day after the date of the determination.

(e) If, after receiving a certification under Subsection (a), the juvenile probation department determines that the person's records are not eligible to be sealed, the juvenile probation department and the Department of Public Safety shall update the juvenile justice information system to reflect that determination and no further action related to the records is required.

(f) Not later than the 60th day after the date a juvenile court receives notice from a juvenile probation department under Subsection (c), the juvenile court shall issue an order sealing all records relating to the person named in the certification.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.255. SEALING RECORDS WITHOUT APPLICATION: CONDUCT INDICATING NEED FOR SUPERVISION. (a) A person who was referred to a juvenile court for conduct indicating a need for supervision is entitled to have all records related to all conduct indicating a need for supervision matters sealed without applying to the juvenile court if the person:

(1) has records relating to the conduct filed with the court clerk;

(2) is at least 18 years of age;

(3) has not been referred to the juvenile probation department for delinquent conduct;

(4) has not as an adult been convicted of a felony; and

(5) does not have any pending charges as an adult for a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail.

(b) The juvenile probation department shall:

(1) give the juvenile court notice that a person's records are eligible for sealing under Subsection (a); and

(2) provide the juvenile court with a list of all referrals relating to that person received by the department and the outcome of each referral.

(c) Not later than the 60th day after the date the juvenile court receives notice from the juvenile probation department under Subsection (b), the juvenile court shall issue an order sealing all records relating to the person named in the notice.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.2551. SEALING RECORDS WITHOUT APPLICATION: FINDING OF NOT TRUE. A juvenile court, on the court's own motion and without a hearing, shall immediately order the sealing of all records related to the alleged conduct if the court enters a finding that the allegations are not true.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.256. APPLICATION FOR SEALING RECORDS. (a) Notwithstanding Sections 58.253 and 58.255, a person may file an application for the sealing of records related to the person in the juvenile court served by the juvenile probation department to which the person was referred. The court may not charge a fee for filing the application, regardless of the form of the application.

(a-1) An application filed under this section may be sent to the juvenile court by any reasonable method authorized under Rule 21, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, including secure electronic means.

(b) An application filed under this section must include either the following information or the reason that one or more of the following is not included in the application:

(1) the person's:

(A) full name;

(B) sex;

(C) race or ethnicity;

(D) date of birth;

(E) driver's license or identification card number; and

(F) social security number;

(2) the conduct for which the person was referred to the juvenile probation department, including the date on which the conduct was alleged or found to have been committed;

(3) the cause number assigned to each petition relating to the person filed in juvenile court, if any, and the court in which the petition was filed; and

(4) a list of all entities the person believes have possession of records related to the person, including the applicable entities listed under Section 58.258(b).

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the juvenile court may order the sealing of records related to all matters for which the person was referred to the juvenile probation department if the person:

(1) is at least 17 years of age, or is younger than 17 years of age and at least one year has elapsed after the date of final discharge in each matter for which the person was referred to the juvenile probation department;

(2) does not have any delinquent conduct matters pending with any juvenile probation department or juvenile court;

(3) was not transferred by a juvenile court to a criminal court for prosecution under Section 54.02;

(4) has not as an adult been convicted of a felony; and

(5) does not have any pending charges as an adult for a felony or a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail.

(d) A court may not order the sealing of the records of a person who:

(1) received a determinate sentence for engaging in:

(A) delinquent conduct that violated a penal law listed under Section 53.045; or

(B) habitual felony conduct as described by Section 51.031;

(2) is currently required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(3) was committed to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or to a post-adjudication secure correctional facility under Section 54.04011, unless the person has been discharged from the agency to which the person was committed.

(e) On receipt of an application under this section, the court may:

(1) order the sealing of the person's records immediately, without a hearing; or

(2) hold a hearing under Section 58.257 at the court's discretion to determine whether to order the sealing of the person's records.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 248 (H.B. 1401), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 58.257. HEARING REGARDING SEALING OF RECORDS. (a) A hearing regarding the sealing of a person's records must be held not later than the 60th day after the date the court receives the person's application under Section 58.256.

(b) The court shall give reasonable notice of a hearing under this section to:

(1) the person who is the subject of the records;

(2) the person's attorney who made the application for sealing on behalf of the person, if any;

(3) the prosecuting attorney for the juvenile court;

(4) all entities named in the application that the person believes possess eligible records related to the person; and

(5) any individual or entity whose presence at the hearing is requested by the person or prosecutor.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.258. ORDER SEALING RECORDS. (a) An order sealing the records of a person under this subchapter must include either the following information or the reason one or more of the following is not included in the order:

(1) the person's:

(A) full name;

(B) sex;

(C) race or ethnicity;

(D) date of birth;

(E) driver's license or identification card number; and

(F) social security number;

(2) each instance of conduct indicating a need for supervision or delinquent conduct alleged against the person or for which the person was referred to the juvenile justice system;

(3) the date on which and the county in which each instance of conduct was alleged to have occurred;

(4) if any petitions relating to the person were filed in juvenile court, the cause number assigned to each petition and the court and county in which each petition was filed; and

(5) a list of the entities believed to be in possession of the records that have been ordered sealed, including the entities listed under Subsection (b).

(b) Not later than the 60th day after the date of the entry of the order, the court shall provide a copy of the order to:

(1) the Department of Public Safety;

(2) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, if the person was committed to the department;

(3) the clerk of court;

(4) the juvenile probation department serving the court;

(5) the prosecutor's office;

(6) each law enforcement agency that had contact with the person in relation to the conduct that is the subject of the sealing order;

(7) each public or private agency that had custody of or that provided supervision or services to the person in relation to the conduct that is the subject of the sealing order; and

(8) each official, agency, or other entity that the court has reason to believe has any record containing information that is related to the conduct that is the subject of the sealing order.

(c) On entry of the order, all adjudications relating to the person are vacated and the proceedings are dismissed and treated for all purposes as though the proceedings had never occurred. The clerk of court shall:

(1) seal all court records relating to the proceedings, including any records created in the clerk's case management system; and

(2) send copies of the order to all entities listed in the order by any reasonable method, including certified mail or secure electronic means.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 248 (H.B. 1401), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 58.259. ACTIONS TAKEN ON RECEIPT OF ORDER TO SEAL RECORDS. (a) An entity receiving an order to seal the records of a person issued under this subchapter shall, not later than the 61st day after the date of receiving the order, take the following actions, as applicable:

(1) the Department of Public Safety shall:

(A) limit access to the records relating to the person in the juvenile justice information system to only the Texas Juvenile Justice Department for the purpose of conducting research and statistical studies;

(B) destroy any other records relating to the person in the department's possession, including DNA records as provided by Section 411.151, Government Code; and

(C) send written verification of the limitation and destruction of the records to the issuing court;

(2) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department shall:

(A) seal all records relating to the person, other than those exempted from sealing under Section 58.252; and

(B) send written verification of the sealing of the records to the issuing court;

(3) a public or private agency or institution that had custody of or provided supervision or services to the person who is the subject of the records, the juvenile probation department, a law enforcement entity, or a prosecuting attorney shall:

(A) seal all records relating to the person; and

(B) send written verification of the sealing of the records to the issuing court; and

(4) any other entity that receives an order to seal a person's records shall:

(A) send any records relating to the person to the issuing court;

(B) delete all index references to the person's records; and

(C) send written verification of the deletion of the index references to the issuing court.

(b) Physical or electronic records are considered sealed if the records are not destroyed but are stored in a manner that allows access to the records only by the custodian of records for the entity possessing the records.

(c) If an entity that received an order to seal records relating to a person later receives an inquiry about a person or the matter contained in the records, the entity must respond that no records relating to the person or the matter exist.

(d) If an entity receiving an order to seal records under this subchapter is unable to comply with the order because the information in the order is incorrect or insufficient to allow the entity to identify the records that are subject to the order, the entity shall notify the issuing court not later than the 30th day after the date of receipt of the order. The court shall take any actions necessary and possible to provide the needed information to the entity, including contacting the person who is the subject of the order or the person's attorney.

(e) If an entity receiving a sealing order under this subchapter has no records related to the person who is the subject of the order, the entity shall provide written verification of that fact to the issuing court not later than the 30th day after the date of receipt of the order.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.260. INSPECTION AND RELEASE OF SEALED RECORDS. (a) A juvenile court may allow, by order, the inspection of records sealed under this subchapter or under Section 58.003, as that law existed before September 1, 2017, only by:

(1) a person named in the order, on the petition of the person who is the subject of the records;

(2) a prosecutor, on the petition of the prosecutor, for the purpose of reviewing the records for possible use:

(A) in a capital prosecution; or

(B) for the enhancement of punishment under Section 12.42, Penal Code; or

(3) a court, the Texas Department of Criminal Justice, or the Texas Juvenile Justice Department for the purposes of Article 62.007(e), Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) After a petitioner inspects records under this section, the court may order the release of any or all of the records to the petitioner on the motion of the petitioner.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.261. EFFECT OF SEALING RECORDS. (a) A person whose records have been sealed under this subchapter or under Section 58.003, as that law existed before September 1, 2017, is not required to state in any proceeding or in any application for employment, licensing, admission, housing, or other public or private benefit that the person has been the subject of a juvenile matter.

(b) If a person's records have been sealed, the information in the records, the fact that the records once existed, or the person's denial of the existence of the records or of the person's involvement in a juvenile matter may not be used against the person in any manner, including in:

(1) a perjury prosecution or other criminal proceeding;

(2) a civil proceeding, including an administrative proceeding involving a governmental entity;

(3) an application process for licensing or certification; or

(4) an admission, employment, or housing decision.

(c) A person who is the subject of the sealed records may not waive the protected status of the records or the consequences of the protected status.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.262. INFORMATION GIVEN TO CHILD REGARDING SEALING OF RECORDS. (a) When a child is referred to the juvenile probation department, an employee of the juvenile probation department shall give the child and the child's parent, guardian, or custodian a written explanation describing the process of sealing records under this subchapter and a copy of this subchapter.

(b) On the final discharge of a child, or on the last official action in the matter if there is no adjudication, a probation officer or official at the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, as appropriate, shall give the child and the child's parent, guardian, or custodian a written explanation regarding the eligibility of the child's records for sealing under this subchapter and a copy of this subchapter.

(c) The written explanation provided to a child under Subsections (a) and (b) must include the requirements for a record to be eligible for sealing, including an explanation of the records that are exempt from sealing under Section 58.252, and the following information:

(1) that, regardless of whether the child's conduct was adjudicated, the child has a juvenile record with the Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation;

(2) the child's juvenile record is a permanent record unless the record is sealed under this subchapter;

(3) except as provided by Section 58.260, the child's juvenile record, other than treatment records made confidential by law, may be accessed by a police officer, sheriff, prosecutor, probation officer, correctional officer, or other criminal or juvenile justice official unless the record is sealed as provided by this subchapter;

(4) sealing of the child's records under Section 58.253 or Section 58.255, as applicable, does not require any action by the child or the child's family, including the filing of an application or hiring of a lawyer, but occurs automatically at age 18 or 19 as applicable based on the child's referral and adjudication history;

(5) the child's juvenile record may be eligible for an earlier sealing date under Section 58.256, but an earlier sealing requires the child or an attorney for the child to file an application with the court;

(6) the impact of sealing records on the child; and

(7) the circumstances under which a sealed record may be reopened.

(d) The Texas Juvenile Justice Department shall adopt rules to implement this section and to facilitate the effective explanation of the information required to be communicated by this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.263. DESTRUCTION OF RECORDS: NO PROBABLE CAUSE. The court shall order the destruction of the records relating to the conduct for which a child is taken into custody or referred to juvenile court without being taken into custody, including records contained in the juvenile justice information system, if:

(1) a determination is made under Section 53.01 that no probable cause exists to believe the child engaged in the conduct and the case is not referred to a prosecutor for review under Section 53.012; or

(2) a determination that no probable cause exists to believe the child engaged in the conduct is made by a prosecutor under Section 53.012.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (H.B. 1760), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 58.264. PERMISSIBLE DESTRUCTION OF RECORDS. (a) Subject to Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, Section 202.001, Local Government Code, and any other restrictions imposed by an entity's records retention guidelines, the following persons may authorize the destruction of records in a closed juvenile matter, regardless of the date the records were created:

(1) a juvenile board, in relation to the records in the possession of the juvenile probation department;

(2) the head of a law enforcement agency, in relation to the records in the possession of the agency; and

(3) a prosecuting attorney, in relation to the records in the possession of the prosecuting attorney's office.

(b) The records related to a person referred to a juvenile probation department may be destroyed if the person:

(1) is at least 18 years of age, and:

(A) the most serious conduct for which the person was referred was conduct indicating a need for supervision, whether or not the person was adjudicated; or

(B) the referral or information did not relate to conduct indicating a need for supervision or delinquent conduct and the juvenile probation department, prosecutor, or juvenile court did not take action on the referral or information for that reason;

(2) is at least 21 years of age, and:

(A) the most serious conduct for which the person was adjudicated was delinquent conduct that violated a penal law of the grade of misdemeanor; or

(B) the most serious conduct for which the person was referred was delinquent conduct and the person was not adjudicated as having engaged in the conduct; or

(3) is at least 31 years of age and the most serious conduct for which the person was adjudicated was delinquent conduct that violated a penal law of the grade of felony.

(c) If a record contains information relating to more than one person referred to a juvenile probation department, the record may only be destroyed if:

(1) the destruction of the record is authorized under this section; and

(2) information in the record that may be destroyed under this section can be separated from information that is not authorized to be destroyed.

(d) Electronic records are considered to be destroyed if the electronic records, including the index to the records, are deleted.

(e) Converting physical records to electronic records and subsequently destroying the physical records while maintaining the electronic records is not considered destruction of a record under this subchapter.

(f) This section does not authorize the destruction of the records of the juvenile court or clerk of court.

(g) This section does not authorize the destruction of records maintained for statistical and research purposes by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department in a juvenile information and case management system authorized under Section 58.403.

(h) This section does not affect the destruction of physical records and files authorized by the Texas State Library Records Retention Schedule.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.265. JUVENILE RECORDS NOT SUBJECT TO EXPUNCTION. Records to which this chapter applies are not subject to an order of expunction issued by any court.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 1304), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. LOCAL JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM

Sec. 58.301. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "County juvenile board" means a juvenile board created under Chapter 152, Human Resources Code.

(2) "Juvenile facility" means a facility that:

(A) serves juveniles under a juvenile court's jurisdiction; and

(B) is operated as a holdover facility, a pre-adjudication detention facility, a nonsecure facility, or a post-adjudication secure correctional facility.

(2-a) "Governmental juvenile facility" means a juvenile facility operated by a unit of government.

(3) "Governmental service provider" means a juvenile justice service provider operated by a unit of government.

(4) "Local juvenile justice information system" means a county or multicounty computerized database of information concerning children, with data entry and access by the partner agencies that are members of the system.

(5) "Partner agency" means a service provider or juvenile facility that is authorized by this subchapter to be a member of a local juvenile justice information system or that has applied to be a member of a local juvenile justice information system and has been approved by the county juvenile board or regional juvenile board committee as a member of the system.

(6) "Regional juvenile board committee" means a committee that is composed of two members from each county juvenile board in a region that comprises a multicounty local juvenile information system.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.302. PURPOSES OF SYSTEM. The purposes of a local juvenile justice information system are to:

(1) provide accurate information at the county or regional level relating to children who come into contact with the juvenile justice system;

(2) assist in the development and delivery of services to children in the juvenile justice system;

(3) assist in the development and delivery of services to children:

(A) who school officials have reasonable cause to believe have committed an offense for which a report is required under Section 37.015, Education Code; or

(B) who have been expelled, the expulsion of which school officials are required to report under Section 52.041;

(4) provide for an efficient transmission of juvenile records from justice and municipal courts to county juvenile probation departments and the juvenile court and from county juvenile probation departments and juvenile court to the state juvenile justice information system created by Subchapter B;

(5) provide efficient computerized case management resources to juvenile courts, prosecutors, court clerks, county juvenile probation departments, and partner agencies authorized by this subchapter;

(6) provide a directory of services available to children to the partner agencies to facilitate the delivery of services to children;

(7) provide an efficient means for municipal and justice courts to report filing of charges, adjudications, and dispositions of juveniles to the juvenile court as required by Section 51.08; and

(8) provide a method for agencies to fulfill their duties under Section 58.108, including the electronic transmission of information required to be sent to the Department of Public Safety by Section 58.110(f).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 58.303. LOCAL JUVENILE JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM. (a) Juvenile justice agencies in a county or region of this state may jointly create and maintain a local juvenile justice information system to aid in processing the cases of children under this code, to facilitate the delivery of services to children in the juvenile justice system, and to aid in the early identification of at-risk and delinquent children.

(b) A local juvenile justice information system may contain the following components:

(1) case management resources for juvenile courts, court clerks, prosecuting attorneys, and county juvenile probation departments;

(2) reporting systems to fulfill statutory requirements for reporting in the juvenile justice system;

(3) service provider directories and indexes of agencies providing services to children;

(4) victim-witness notices required under Chapter 57;

(5) electronic filing of complaints or petitions, court orders, and other documents filed with the court, including documents containing electronic signatures;

(6) electronic offense and intake processing;

(7) case docket management and calendaring;

(8) communications by email or other electronic communications between partner agencies;

(9) reporting of charges filed, adjudications and dispositions of juveniles by municipal and justice courts and the juvenile court, and transfers of cases to the juvenile court as authorized or required by Section 51.08;

(10) reporting to schools under Article 15.27, Code of Criminal Procedure, by law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys, and juvenile courts;

(11) records of adjudications and dispositions, including probation conditions ordered by the juvenile court;

(12) warrant management and confirmation capabilities; and

(13) case management for juveniles in juvenile facilities.

(c) Expired.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.304. TYPES OF INFORMATION CONTAINED IN A LOCAL JUVENILE INFORMATION SYSTEM. (a) A local juvenile justice information system must consist of:

(1) information relating to all referrals to the juvenile court of any type, including referrals for conduct indicating a need for supervision and delinquent conduct; and

(2) information relating to:

(A) the juvenile;

(B) the intake or referral of the juvenile into the juvenile justice system for any offense or conduct;

(C) the detention of the juvenile;

(D) the prosecution of the juvenile;

(E) the disposition of the juvenile's case, including the name and description of any program to which the juvenile is referred; and

(F) the probation, placement, or commitment of the juvenile.

(b) To the extent possible and subject to Subsection (a), the local juvenile justice information system may include the following information for each juvenile taken into custody, detained, or referred under this title:

(1) the juvenile's name, including other names by which the juvenile is known;

(2) the juvenile's date and place of birth;

(3) the juvenile's physical description, including sex, weight, height, race, ethnicity, eye color, hair color, scars, marks, and tattoos;

(4) the juvenile's state identification number and other identifying information;

(5) the juvenile's fingerprints and photograph;

(6) the juvenile's last known residential address, including the census tract number designation for the address;

(7) the name, address, and phone number of the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian;

(8) the name and identifying number of the agency that took into custody or detained the juvenile;

(9) each date of custody or detention;

(10) a detailed description of the conduct for which the juvenile was taken into custody, detained, or referred, including the level and degree of the alleged offense;

(11) the name and identifying number of the juvenile intake agency or juvenile probation office;

(12) each disposition by the juvenile intake agency or juvenile probation office;

(13) the date of disposition by the juvenile intake agency or juvenile probation office;

(14) the name and identifying number of the prosecutor's office;

(15) each disposition by the prosecutor;

(16) the date of disposition by the prosecutor;

(17) the name and identifying number of the court;

(18) each disposition by the court, including information concerning custody of a juvenile by a juvenile justice agency or county juvenile probation department;

(19) the date of disposition by the court;

(20) any commitment or release under supervision by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, including the date of the commitment or release;

(21) information concerning each appellate proceeding;

(22) electronic copies of all documents filed with the court; and

(23) information obtained for the purpose of diagnosis, examination, evaluation, treatment, or referral for treatment of a child by a public or private agency or institution providing supervision of a child by arrangement of the juvenile court or having custody of the child under order of the juvenile court.

(c) If the Department of Public Safety assigns a state identification number for the juvenile, the identification number shall be entered in the local juvenile information system.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 67, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.305. PARTNER AGENCIES. (a) A local juvenile justice information system shall to the extent possible include the following partner agencies within that county:

(1) the juvenile court and court clerk;

(2) justice of the peace and municipal courts;

(3) the county juvenile probation department;

(4) the prosecuting attorneys who prosecute juvenile cases in juvenile court, municipal court, or justice court;

(5) law enforcement agencies;

(6) each public school district in the county;

(7) service providers approved by the county juvenile board; and

(8) juvenile facilities approved by the county juvenile board.

(b) A local juvenile justice information system for a multicounty region shall to the extent possible include the partner agencies listed in Subsections (a)(1)-(6) for each county in the region and the following partner agencies from within the multicounty region that have applied for membership in the system and have been approved by the regional juvenile board committee:

(1) service providers; and

(2) juvenile facilities.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 949 (H.B. 1575), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.306. ACCESS TO INFORMATION; LEVELS. (a) This section describes the level of access to information to which each partner agency in a local juvenile justice information system is entitled.

(b) Information is at Access Level 1 if the information relates to a child:

(1) who:

(A) a school official has reasonable grounds to believe has committed an offense for which a report is required under Section 37.015, Education Code; or

(B) has been expelled, the expulsion of which is required to be reported under Section 52.041; and

(2) who has not been charged with a fineable only offense, a status offense, or delinquent conduct.

(c) Information is at Access Level 2 if the information relates to a child who:

(1) is alleged in a justice or municipal court to have committed a fineable only offense, municipal ordinance violation, or status offense; and

(2) has not been charged with delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision.

(d) Information is at Access Level 3 if the information relates to a child who is alleged to have engaged in delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (i), Level 1 Access is by public school districts in the county or region served by the local juvenile justice information system.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (i), Level 2 Access is by:

(1) justice of the peace courts that process juvenile cases; and

(2) municipal courts that process juvenile cases.

(g) Except as provided by Subsection (i), Level 3 Access is by:

(1) the juvenile court and court clerk;

(2) the prosecuting attorney;

(3) the county juvenile probation department;

(4) law enforcement agencies;

(5) governmental service providers that are partner agencies;

(6) governmental juvenile facilities that are partner agencies; and

(7) a private juvenile facility that is a partner agency, except the access is limited to information that relates to a child detained or placed in the custody of the facility.

(h) Access for Level 1 agencies is only to information at Level 1. Access for Level 2 agencies is only to information at Levels 1 and 2. Access for Level 3 agencies is to information at Levels 1, 2, and 3.

(i) Information described by Section 58.304(b)(23) may be accessed only by:

(1) the juvenile court and court clerk;

(2) the county juvenile probation department;

(3) a governmental juvenile facility that is a partner agency; and

(4) a private juvenile facility that is a partner agency, except the access is limited to information that relates to a child detained or placed in the custody of the facility.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 58.307. CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION. (a) Information that is part of a local juvenile justice information system is not public information and may not be released to the public, except as authorized by law.

(b) Information that is part of a local juvenile justice information system is for the professional use of the partner agencies that are members of the system and may be used only by authorized employees of those agencies to discharge duties of those agencies.

(c) Information from a local juvenile justice information system may not be disclosed to persons, agencies, or organizations that are not members of the system except to the extent disclosure is authorized or mandated by this title.

(d) Information in a local juvenile justice information system is subject to destruction, sealing, or restricted access as provided by this title.

(e) Information in a local juvenile justice information system, including electronic signature systems, shall be protected from unauthorized access by a system of access security and any access to information in a local juvenile information system performed by browser software shall be at the level of at least 2048-bit encryption. A juvenile board or a regional juvenile board committee shall require all partner agencies to maintain security and restrict access in accordance with the requirements of this title.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1093 (H.B. 3705), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D-1. REPORTS ON COUNTY INTERNET WEBSITES

Sec. 58.351. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies only to a county with a population of 600,000 or more.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 26(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 58.352. INFORMATION POSTED ON COUNTY WEBSITE. (a) A juvenile court judge in a county to which this subchapter applies shall post a report on the Internet website of the county in which the court is located. The report must include:

(1) the total number of children committed by the judge to:

(A) a correctional facility operated by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department; or

(B) a post-adjudication secure correctional facility as that term is defined by Section 54.04011; and

(2) for each child committed to a facility described by Subdivision (1):

(A) a general description of the offense committed by the child or the conduct of the child that led to the child's commitment to the facility;

(B) the year the child was committed to the facility; and

(C) the age range, race, and gender of the child.

(b) Not later than the 10th day following the first day of each quarter, a juvenile court judge shall update the information posted on a county Internet website under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 26(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 68, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 58.353. CONFIDENTIALITY. A record posted on a county Internet website under this subchapter may not include any information that personally identifies a child.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 26(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER E. STATEWIDE JUVENILE INFORMATION AND CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM

Sec. 58.401. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Department" means the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

(2) "Criminal justice agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 411.082, Government Code.

(3) "Juvenile justice agency" means an agency that has custody or control over juvenile offenders.

(4) "Partner agencies" means those agencies described in Section 58.305 as well as private service providers to the juvenile justice system.

(5) "System" means an automated statewide juvenile information and case management system.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 69, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 58.402. PURPOSES OF SYSTEM. The purposes of the system are to:

(1) provide accurate information at the statewide level relating to children who come into contact with the juvenile justice system;

(2) facilitate communication and information sharing between authorized entities in criminal and juvenile justice agencies and partner agencies regarding effective and efficient identification of and service delivery to juvenile offenders; and

(3) provide comprehensive juvenile justice information and case management abilities that will meet the common data collection, reporting, and management needs of juvenile probation departments in this state and provide the flexibility to accommodate individualized requirements.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 58.403. JUVENILE INFORMATION SYSTEM. (a) Through the adoption of an interlocal contract under Chapter 791, Government Code, with one or more counties, the department may participate in and assist counties in the creation, operation, and maintenance of a system that is intended for statewide use to:

(1) aid in processing the cases of children under this title;

(2) facilitate the delivery of services to children in the juvenile justice system;

(3) aid in the early identification of at-risk and delinquent children; and

(4) facilitate cross-jurisdictional sharing of information related to juvenile offenders between authorized criminal and juvenile justice agencies and partner agencies.

(b) The department may use funds appropriated for the implementation of this section to pay costs incurred under an interlocal contract described by Subsection (a), including license fees, maintenance and operations costs, administrative costs, and any other costs specified in the interlocal contract.

(c) The department may provide training services to counties on the use and operation of a system created, operated, or maintained by one or more counties under Subsection (a).

(d) Subchapter L, Chapter 2054, Government Code, does not apply to the statewide juvenile information and case management system created under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1337 (S.B. 58), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 2.002, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 70, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 58.404. INFORMATION COLLECTED BY DEPARTMENT. The department may collect and maintain all information related to juvenile offenders and all offenses committed by a juvenile offender, including all information collected and maintained under Subchapters B and D.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 71, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 58.405. AUTHORITY CUMULATIVE. The authority granted by this subchapter is cumulative of all other authority granted by this chapter to a county, the department, or a juvenile justice agency and nothing in this subchapter limits the authority of a county, the department, or a juvenile justice agency under this chapter to create an information system or to share information related to a juvenile.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 72, eff. September 1, 2015.